Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 739,667
(2) Grants ....................................... $ 2,000,000
SECTION 2. Of the moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945,  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall allocate
$10,039,603 to  the Department of State Police for fish and wildlife activities to implement
Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 3. Of the  moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945, the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board shall allocate
$7,315,813 to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife for activities  and projects to imple-
ment Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. Of the moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945,  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall allocate
$8,662,840 to  the State Department of Agriculture for activities and projects to implement
Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 5. Of the  moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945, the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board shall allocate
$6,965,710 to the  Department of Environmental Quality for activities and projects to imple-
ment Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$11,599,080 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board from lottery moneys
deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund established under ORS 541.945,
for operating expenses, activities and projects to implement Article XV, section  4b, of the
Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $711,079
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
Enrolled House Bill 5039 (HB 5039-A) Page 1
of expenses  from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board for debt service.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Watershed En-
hancement Board, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 4,724,462
(2) Grants ....................................... $ 40,765,582
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement
Board, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 3,621,463
(2) Grants ....................................... $ 57,970,114
SECTION 10. (1) The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall establish  by rule a
process for allocating on  a quarterly basis available moneys in the Natural Resources Sub-
account of the Parks and Natural Resources  Fund, established under ORS 541.942, to fulfill
the biennial allocations made in this 2025 Act. Except  as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, all quarterly allocations shall be set at one-eighth of the biennial allocations.
(2) If, in any quarter, the moneys transferred  from the Oregon State Lottery Fund to the
Parks and  Natural Resources Fund are insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations es-
tablished under subsection (1) of this section, the allocations shall be reduced proportionately
by amounts sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 11. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures by  the Oregon
Watershed Enhancement Board for State Treasurer  charges for investment-related trans-
actions are not limited.
SECTION 12. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5039 (HB 5039-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5039 (HB 5039-A) Page 3